North Carolina, session 2025, SB961.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 131E-18 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131E-18. Commissioners.
(a) The mayor or the chairman of the county board shall appoint the commissioners of
the authority. There shall be not less than six eight and not more than 30 38 commissioners. Upon
a finding that it is in the public interest, or that it is required to meet the requirements of this
section, the commissioners may adopt a resolution increasing or decreasing the number of
commissioners by a fixed number; Provided that however no decrease in the number of
commissioners shall shorten a commissioner's term. A certified copy of the resolution and a list
of nominees shall be submitted to the mayor or the chairman of the county board of
commissioners for appointments in accordance with the procedures set forth in subsection (d) of
this section. The commissioners of the authority shall include at least the following:
(1) Four members of the public who are not healthcare providers licensed under
Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, married to healthcare providers licensed
under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, employed by the authority, or
married to anyone employed by the authority.
(2) Four elected officials who are either of the following:
a. Commissioners of a county that is, in whole or in part, within the
hospital authority's territorial boundaries as defined in G.S. 131E-20.
b. Elected officials in a city or town that is within the hospital authority's
territorial boundaries as defined in G.S. 131E-20.
…
(i) Any meeting of the commissioners of a hospital authority shall be conducted in
accordance with Article 33C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 1.(b) A hospital authority that already has the member of the public or
elected official commissioners required by G.S. 131E-18(a)(1) and (a)(2), as amended by Section
1(a) of this act, shall not be required to appoint additional commissioners.
SECTION 1.(c) To ensure term staggering, the first two members of the public and
elected officials required to be appointed by G.S. 131E-18, as amended by Section 1(a) of this
act, shall serve an initial term of one year. The third and fourth members of the public and elected
officials required to be appointed by G.S. 131E-18, as amended by Section 1(a) of this act, shall
serve an initial term of two years. All subsequent terms shall be for three years. All members
required to be appointed by this act shall be appointed no later than December 1, 2026.
*S961-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to ensure hospital authorities are in compliance with the provisions
of this act.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 961-First Edition